Utah statutes.
41-1a-1309.   Boarding with intent to commit injury to motor vehicle,
trailer, or semitrailer -- Class C misdemeanor.
It is a class C misdemeanor for a person with intent to commit any criminal
mischief, injury, or other crime to:
(1)  climb into or upon a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer, whether it
is in motion or at rest;
(2)  attempt to manipulate any of the levers, starting mechanism, brakes, or
other mechanism or device of a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer while
the same is at rest and unattended; or
(3)  set in motion any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer while the same
is at rest and unattended.
